Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-215
Member, defined.

Member shall mean a person who has qualified for and been admitted to membership in a licensed organization pursuant to its bylaws, articles of incorporation, charter, rules, or other written statement for purposes other than conducting activities under the Nebraska Bingo Act. Member shall not include social or honorary members.

Laws 1985, LB 408, § 11;

R.S.Supp.,1985, § 9-140.16;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 16;

Laws 1988, LB 295, § 7.